Wisconsin, session 2025, AB735.
do enact as follows:AB735,11Section 1. 16.281 of the statutes is created to read:AB735,2,4216.281 Small business clearinghouse. (1) Establishment of 3clearinghouse. The department shall establish on the Internet a clearinghouse of 4information for small businesses in this state.AB735,2,115(2) Information published on clearinghouse. The department shall 6coordinate with the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation, the Wisconsin 7Housing and Economic Development Authority, the departments of workforce 8development and revenue, local governments, local economic development 9organizations, and any other person the department considers appropriate, to 10publish information relevant to small businesses on the clearinghouse established 11under sub. (1), including information relating to all of the following:AB735,2,1312(a) Bidding opportunities for small businesses to participate in state and local 13government contracts.AB735,2,1514(b) Economic development programs, as defined in s. 238.01 (3), whether 15public or private, that may offer benefits to small businesses.AB735,2,1816(c) Courses of instruction, networking opportunities, and other events or 17opportunities encouraging the establishment, development, and expansion of small 18businesses.AB735,3,21(d) Requirements for small businesses to obtain from the state or a local 2government any license, permit, or other authorization.AB735,3,43(e) Requirements for small businesses to pay any tax, fee, assessment, or 4other charge imposed by the state or a local government.AB735,3,55